frontend/src/assets/hunspell/rm-sutsilv/rm-sutsilv.dic
Vus durmez/T
acquistassas/PQT
activad/PQT
adampleschas/PQT
admiral/T
adopto/PQT
aintamiez/T
alarmeschel/PQT
alterneschias/PQT
ambaleschias/PQT
ambratschagn/PQT
amparànd/PQT
ampeari/PQT
amportas/PQT
ampundeias/PQT
analisava/PQT
ancrassani/PQT
ancreschida/PQT
andateschian/PQT
aneals/T
anfarainsa/PQT
angaldessan/PQT
angaschel/PQT
anglatscheian/PQT
angutavani/PQT
angutias/PQT
ansalassan/PQT
antardan/PQT
antissessas/PQT
antscharclassas/PQT
antschareian/PQT
anvarnava/PQT
anzena da spartgida/T
apelesch jou/PQT
arcitectonicas/T
arcivo/PQT
aromisad/PQT
arsas/PQT
aschanto/PQT
assigneada/PQT
aszandeviou/PQT
aucziunader/T
augmantar/PQT
avertura da la tgatscha/T
aviseschian/PQT
baghigeavan/PQT
bagneassers/T
balsamavan/PQT
bandaschas/T
baratavani/PQT
barscheias/PQT
barsos/PQT
batieaviou/PQT
batiou/PQT
betschi/PQT
betùn cun armadira sut tensiùn/T
bisgeias/PQT
bissigear anzatgi/T
blasmaviou/PQT
boicotada/PQT
brancadas/PQT
broschuro, broschurada/T
bufas/PQT
bumbardescha/PQT
bunifitgess jou/PQT
cadagni/PQT
cadiptgainsa/PQT
calzerass/PQT
camarats/T
cantarleschiou/PQT
canutada/PQT
captivescha/PQT
carezeian/PQT
carmalesch/PQT
cartevan/PQT
casaglian/PQT
catramavan/PQT
catramaviou/PQT
cihreg/PQT
clacùns/T
clod/PQT
clutschavas/PQT
codad/PQT
comas/T
comenteschias/PQT
condolassas/PQT
conferieus/PQT
conserveschan/PQT
consumeschani/PQT
contemplass/PQT
conzepevas/PQT
conziliear/PQT
corodesch/PQT
cotschnainsa/PQT
cremeias/PQT
cristalisass/PQT
crivlad/PQT
cugliessan/PQT
cuirassar/PQT
cumbatevan/PQT
cumegna/T
cumpensainsa/PQT
cumplitgear/PQT
cunaschevels/T
cundensagn/PQT
cunsaint/PQT
cunstani/PQT
cuntercroc/T
cuntschaviou/PQT
cunvertagn/PQT
cureschiou/PQT
curseias/PQT
cuv/PQT
da surangiou/T
damussaz/PQT
dar màn/T
dasdaz/PQT
daspitassani/PQT
debiteias/PQT
decumponevas/PQT
defileschan/PQT
dementeschani/PQT
demissiunassani/PQT
deponessas/PQT
deponevani/PQT
despot/T
destrueschan/PQT
dezeni/T
diagnostitgànd/PQT
diletànta/T
discretameing/T
discriminavan/PQT
disputada/PQT
dissegnias/PQT
diteschi/PQT
do suainter/PQT
doros/PQT
dubitànd/PQT
dugatassani/PQT
dutg/T
eantretschiou/PQT
ediziùn/T
emaglieaviou/PQT
equivalaviou/PQT
eruziùns/T
executagn/PQT
exerziteschias/PQT
exponel/PQT
fabulainsa/PQT
fagugnessas/PQT
farmada da bus/T
fastageias/PQT
feastageias/PQT
fidavani/PQT
fidimànd/PQT
fimanto, fimantada/T
fitar/PQT
flancainsa/PQT
forel/PQT
fortifitgesch/PQT
fraternisar/PQT
frodass jou/PQT
frustrainsa/PQT
furbessani/PQT
furiclagn/PQT
garagessiou/PQT
gaslagn/PQT
geniturs nutriders/T
gibleian/PQT
girar/PQT
giugainta/PQT
glisgneavas/PQT
gnignagn/PQT
grats/T
grugnainsa/PQT
grupass/PQT
handlagessas/PQT
hipercolonisavani/PQT
hospitescha/PQT
ignoraviou/PQT
imponer/PQT
impregneschian/PQT
incumbensaviou/PQT
indemniseschel/PQT
ingiuriear/PQT
inserassas/PQT
institueian/PQT
internavan/PQT
interprendel/PQT
inundeian/PQT
iradieaviou/PQT
irtaviou/PQT
lala/PQT
lapaviou/PQT
lavadegn/T
lessan/PQT
liegias/PQT
lingess/PQT
logani/PQT
luava/PQT
luschardos/PQT
magnan/PQT
magnetisaviou/PQT
malgartegel/PQT
mancantass jou/PQT
manevros/PQT
manual/T
maritada/PQT
marschassan/PQT
mastirassas/PQT
mazacrassiou/PQT
mefa/T
miaulian/PQT
miravan/PQT
missiunesch jou/PQT
modèl standard/T
movas/PQT
mudarànd/PQT
munzaneian/PQT
murdregi/PQT
musseian/PQT
naturalisad/PQT
navigear/PQT
nineias/PQT
nominadas/PQT
numer/T
nunproductiv/T
obtanessan/PQT
odurassiou/PQT
optimissems/T
oval/T
padiman/PQT
palandrass/PQT
pandarleschian/PQT
paneschi/PQT
pardeartadad/T
parmatessiou/PQT
parschuadessas/PQT
partureva/PQT
partutgeias/PQT
pasturisassiou/PQT
patitscheavas/PQT
peal cornea/T
periclitada/PQT
pestgan/PQT
pievlameing/T
piteian/PQT
pitgessas/PQT
plantavan/PQT
pliian/PQT
pluglius/T
politiseian/PQT
porschani/PQT
post da polizeia/T
predastegn jou/PQT
predominassani/PQT
preparavan/PQT
prevasevan/PQT
privatisass/PQT
progredeschias/PQT
projectaviou/PQT
protocolass jou/PQT
prozidessani/PQT
pudings/T
puntgagnas/PQT
pupargneschani/PQT
putschi/T
quintar sei/T
quiteschias/PQT
radembian/PQT
radiofoneschian/PQT
rafos/PQT
ramassava/PQT
rancanuschànd/PQT
ras jou/PQT
raschaintnova/T
ratschavessani/PQT
ravgiaintan/PQT
reanimeschel/PQT
reconziliescha/PQT
redutgeadas/PQT
refutavas/PQT
registraziùn fatga ordafora/T
remnan/PQT
remunereian/PQT
reprivatisaziùns/T
resainti/PQT
resozialisad/PQT
restorada/PQT
retardànd/PQT
revoltavas/PQT
rezeptur/T
risguard/PQT
risguardadas/PQT
rotlel/PQT
rugeias/PQT
rumpatguma/T
s'andirir/PQT
sabrancagn/PQT
sabranceias/PQT
sacopular/PQT
sacumponevani/PQT
sacumprovaz/PQT
sadaporti/PQT
sadezidevan/PQT
sadisa/PQT
sadumogna/PQT
safigiraz/PQT
saforel/PQT
sagutevani/PQT
salaregn/T
salucaintel/PQT
samascragn/PQT
samascravan/PQT
samuvieu/PQT
sanudeias/PQT
sapandessani/PQT
sapitgeian/PQT
saprofilesch/PQT
saprovidevani/PQT
saramantada/PQT
sarastranschainsa/PQT
saravgianteian/PQT
sarieschieu/PQT
sarunànd/PQT
sasalvel/PQT
saschleii/PQT
saschubargessan/PQT
sascuntradas/PQT
sasgriflaviou/PQT
saspieglo/PQT
sastabiliseschas/PQT
sastulescha/PQT
sasurfatgas/PQT
sasvilupeschani/PQT
satistgantass jou/PQT
satrapla/PQT
savieult/PQT
sbarifavas/PQT
sbartgi/PQT
sbuglez/PQT
scalinar/PQT
scalpassiou/PQT
scartatschel/PQT
schampo/T
schendraz/PQT
schladarneschi/PQT
schladeschi/PQT
schliheadas/PQT
schlupeg/PQT
schmagnias/PQT
schmatgessiou/PQT
schmugaglieavani/PQT
schnarantavas/PQT
schubargiagn/PQT
schurmagiagn/PQT
scriveian/PQT
scumgeadra/T
scumpegliel/PQT
scurveartan/PQT
sdarnos/PQT
sdratschleschian/PQT
sera d'atun/T
setgaintani/PQT
sfigliead/PQT
sfruschadras/T
sfundran/PQT
sglischeada/PQT
sgradeian/PQT
sgrugnan/PQT
siblo/PQT
sigilassani/PQT
sitgieu/PQT
sortevas/PQT
sparmalassan/PQT
spertgias/PQT
spidassan/PQT
splimeian/PQT
sprazlagead/PQT
squadrassas/PQT
stanschantadas/PQT
starmantagn/PQT
stgavalo/PQT
stgiraglia/T
stirian/PQT
strehel/PQT
strianànd/PQT
stulevan/PQT
sturneschias/PQT
subordinavas/PQT
sumaglientschas/T
sunarlassiou/PQT
surgiudida/PQT
surmalageavan/PQT
surprandagn/PQT
surtgargiani/PQT
surudeviou/PQT
suspandainsa/PQT
sutminesch/PQT
suttaxainsa/PQT
tabuiseias/PQT
taingla/T
tantava/PQT
targiànd vetier/PQT
tarmaglieschani/PQT
tecniseschi/PQT
telecabina/T
tganageavan/PQT
tgarniez/T
tgutgantar/PQT
tibems/T
tolcargneschi/PQT
tradir/PQT
transfered/PQT
travaglieias/PQT
travatscheias/PQT
trumfageavan/PQT
tschalat jou/PQT
tschassantavan/PQT
tschocantassiou/PQT
tschorvantass jou/PQT
tundeva/PQT
turnassani/PQT
uegliainsa/PQT
unifitgeias/PQT
urantavan/PQT
vagnir an la tgavela/T
valed/PQT
veder ca sieuva/T
vegetassan/PQT
vilainta/PQT
vilantassani/PQT
zacùn/PQT
zapar anavos/T
zentralisassani/PQT
zircumscret/PQT
zucagear/PQT
